North Dakota, session 69, SB2281.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 57-36-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
57-36-01. Definitions.
As used in this chapter, unless the context or subject matter otherwise requires:
1. "Alternative tobacco product" means a noncombustible product containing nicotine or
synthetic nicotine, intended for human consumption by chewing, absorbing, dissolving,
or any other means.
a. The term includes:
(1) Nicotine gels;
(2) Nicotine pouches; and
(3) Dissolvable tobacco products.
b. The term does not include products approved by the United States food and drug
administration for nicotine replacement therapy.
2. "Chewing tobacco" means any leaf tobacco that is intended to be placed in the mouth.
2.3. "Cigar" means any roll of tobacco wrapped in tobacco.
Page No. 1 25.0684.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
3.4. "Cigarette" means any roll for smoking made wholly or in part of tobacco or processed
tobacco and encased in any material except tobacco. The term also means any
product of a cigarette-making machine.
4.5. "Cigarette-making machine" means a machine used for commercial purposes to
process tobacco into a roll or tube, formed or made from any material other than
tobacco, at a production rate of more than five rolls or tubes per minute.
5.6. "Consumer" means any person who has title to or possession of cigarettes, cigars,
pipe tobacco, electronic smoking devices, or other tobacco products in storage, for
use or other consumption in this state.
6.7. "Dealer" includes a retailer and any person other than a distributor who is engaged in
the business of selling cigarettes, cigarette papers, cigars, pipe tobacco, electronic
smoking devices, or other tobacco products, or any product of a cigarette-making
machine.
7.8. "Distributor" includes any person engaged in the business of producing or
manufacturing cigarettes, cigarette papers, cigars, pipe tobacco, electronic smoking
devices, or other tobacco products, or importing into this state cigarettes, cigarette
papers, cigars, pipe tobacco, electronic smoking devices, or other tobacco products,
for the purpose of distribution and sale thereof to dealers and retailers. The term also
includes a dealer that fabricates, repackages, compounds, or mixes electronic
smoking devices for purposes of sale to a consumer.
8.9. "Electronic smoking device" means a device that may be used to deliver an
aerosolized, vaporized, or heated substance containingthat may contain nicotine,
regardless of whether the nicotine is natural or synthetic, to an individual inhaling from
the device, and includes an electronic cigarette, e-cigar, e-pipe, vape pen, and
e-hookah. The term includes any substance containing nicotine, regardless of whether
the nicotine is natural or synthetic, that may be aerosolized, vaporized, or heated by
the device, regardless of whether the device is sold separately. The term does not
include:
a. A cigarette as defined in section 51-25-01;
b. A cigarette as defined in this section;
Page No. 2 25.0684.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
c. A drug, device, or combination product, as those terms are defined in the federal
Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act [52 Stat. 1040; 21 U.S.C. 301 et seq.], approved
for sale by the United States food and drug administration; or
d. A battery or battery charger when sold separately.
9.10. "Electronic smoking device substance" means any substance for use in an electronic
smoking device that may be aerosolized, vaporized, or heated. The term includes
substances that contain natural or synthetic nicotine.
11. "Licensed dealer" means a dealer licensed under the provisions of this chapter.
10.12. "Licensed distributor" means a distributor licensed under the provisions of this chapter.
11.13. "Other tobacco products" means snuff and chewing tobacco.
12.14. "Outlet" means each place of business from which tobacco products are sold.
13.15. "Person" means any individual, firm, fiduciary, partnership, corporation, limited liability
company, trust, or association however formed.
14.16. "Pipe tobacco" means any processed tobacco that, because of its appearance, type,
packaging, or labeling, is suitable for use and likely to be offered to, or purchased by,
consumers as tobacco to be smoked in a pipe.
15.17. "Place of business" means a place where tobacco products are sold or where tobacco
products are manufactured, fabricated, stored, or kept for purposes of sale or
consumption.
16.18. "Retailer" means a person engaged in the business of selling cigarettes, cigars, pipe
tobacco, electronic smoking devices, or other tobacco products to consumers.
17.19. "Sale" or "sell" applies to gifts, exchanges, and barter.
18.20. "Snuff" means any finely cut, ground, or powdered tobacco that is intended to be
placed in the mouth or nose.
19.21. "Storage" means any keeping or retention of cigarettes, cigars, pipe tobacco,
electronic smoking devices, or other tobacco products for use or consumption in this
state.
20.22. "Use" means the exercise of any right or power incidental to the ownership or
possession of cigarettes, cigars, pipe tobacco, electronic smoking devices, or other
tobacco products.
Page No. 3 25.0684.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 57-36-31 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. All moneys received by the tax commissioner under the provisions of this chapter must
be transmitted to the state treasurer at the end of each month and deposited in the
state treasury to the credit of the general fund, except as hereinafterotherwise
provided in this section, section 57 - 36 - 32, and sections 4 , 5 , 6 , and 7 of this Ac t.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Section 57-36-32 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
57-36-32. Separate and additional taxtaxes on the sale of cigarettes - Collection -
Allocation of revenue - Tax avoidance prohibited.
1. There is hereby levied and assessed and there shallmust be collected by the state tax
commissioner and paid to the state treasurer, upon allon cigarettes sold in this state,
an additional tax, separate and apart from all other taxes, of seventeen mills on each
cigarette, to be collected as existing taxes on cigarettes sold are, or hereafter may be,
collected, by use of appropriate stamps and under similar accounting procedures. NoA
person, firm, corporation, or limited liability company shallmay not transport or, bring,
or cause to be shipped into thethis state of North Dakota any cigarettes as provided
hereinin this section, other than for delivery to wholesalers in this state, without first
paying the tax thereonunder this subsection to the state tax commissioner. All of the
moneys collected by theThe state treasurer shall transfer the funds collected under
this section shall be creditedsubsection to the state general fund.
2. There is levied and assessed and must be collected by the state tax commissioner
and paid to the state treasurer, on cigarettes sold in this state, an additional tax,
separate from all other taxes, of twelve and one - half mills on each cigarette, to be
collected as existing taxes on cigarettes sold are, or may be, collected, by use of
appropriate stamps and under similar accounting procedures. A person, firm,
corporation, or limited liability company may not transport, bring, or cause to be
shipped into this state any cigarettes as provided under this subsection, other than for
delivery to wholesalers in this state, without first paying the tax under this subsection
to the state tax commissioner. The state treasurer shall transfer the funds collected
under this subsection to the tobacco tax distribution fund.
Page No. 4 25.0684.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
SECTION 4. A new section to chapter 57-36 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Separate and additional tax on the sale of cigars - Collection - Allocation of revenue -
Avoidance prohibited.
There is levied and assessed and must be collected by the state tax commissioner and paid
to the state treasurer, on cigars sold in the state, an additional tax, separate from all other taxes,
of thirty - two percent of the wholesale purchase price at which the cigars are purchased by
distributors, to be collected as existing taxes on cigars sold are collected. For purposes of this
section, "wholesale purchase price" means the established price for which a manufacturer sells
cigars to a distributor exclusive of any discount or other reduction. The state treasurer shall
transfer the funds collected under this section to the tobacco tax distribution fund.
SECTION 5. A new section to chapter 57-36 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Separate and additional tax on other tobacco products - Collection - Allocation of
revenue - Avoidance prohibited.
There is levied and assessed and must be collected by the state tax commissioner and paid
to the state treasurer, on other tobacco products sold in the state, an additional tax, separate
from all other taxes, of twenty-eight percent of the wholesale purchase price at which other
tobacco products are purchased by distributors. For the purposes of this section, "wholesale
purchase price" means the established price for which a manufacturer sells other tobacco
products to a distributor exclusive of any discount or other reduction. The state treasurer shall
transfer the funds collected under this section to the tobacco tax distribution fund.
SECTION 6. A new section to chapter 57-36 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Separate and additional tax on alternative tobacco products - Collection - Allocation
of revenue - Avoidance prohibited.
There is levied and assessed and must be collected by the state tax commissioner and paid
to the state treasurer, on alternative tobacco products sold in the state, an additional tax,
separate from all other taxes, of twenty-eight percent of the wholesale purchase price at which
alternative tobacco products are purchased by distributors. For the purposes of this section,
"wholesale purchase price" means the established price for which a manufacturer sells an
Page No. 5 25.0684.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
alternative tobacco product to a distributor exclusive of any discount or other reduction. The
state treasurer shall transfer the funds collected under this section to the tobacco tax
distribution fund.
SECTION 7. A new section to chapter 57-36 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Separate and additional tax on electronic smoking devices and electronic smoking
device substances - Collection - Allocation of revenue - Avoidance prohibited.
There is levied and assessed and must be collected by the state tax commissioner and paid
to the state treasurer, on electronic smoking devices and substances sold in the state for use in
electronic smoking devices, an additional tax, separate from all other taxes, of twenty-eight
percent of the wholesale purchase price at which electronic smoking devices and electronic
smoking device substances are purchased by distributors. For the purposes of this section,
"wholesale purchase price" means the established price for which a manufacturer sells an
electronic smoking device or electronic smoking device substance to a distributor exclusive of
any discount or other reduction. The state treasurer shall transfer the funds collected under this
section to the tobacco tax distribution fund.
SECTION 8. A new section to chapter 57-36 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Tobacco tax distribution fund - Continuing appropriation.
The tobacco tax distribution fund is created as a special fund in the state treasury into which
must be deposited any portion of tobacco tax collections designated by law to be deposited in
the fund. All moneys in the fund are appropriated on a continuing basis to the department of
health and human services for the purposes described in this section. Each month, the
department shall distribute one - half of the moneys in the fund as grants to local public health
units and the remaining moneys in the fund to organizations providing 988 crisis hotline
services.
SECTION 9. EFFECTIVE DATE. Sections 3, 4, 5, 6, and 7 of this Act are effective for
taxable events occurring after June 30, 2025.
Page No. 6 25.0684.02000